Utah statutes.
17-53-313 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Hiring of professional architect, engineer, or surveyor.

Notwithstanding the adoption of some or all of the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, under Section 17-53-225, each county executive that engages the services of a professional architect, engineer, or surveyor and considers more than one such professional for the engagement:

(1)  shall consider, as a minimum, in the selection process:

(a)  the qualifications, experience, and background of each firm submitting a proposal;

(b)  the specific individuals assigned to the project and the time commitments of each to the project; and

(c)  the project schedule and the approach to the project that the firm will take; and

(2)  may engage the services of a professional architect, engineer, or surveyor based on the criteria under Subsection (1) rather than solely on lowest cost.

